Florida, session 2026, HB1315.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 409.9206, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
409.9206 De-risking disease behavioral health intervention
services pilot program.—
(1) LEGISLATIVE FINDING; PURPOSE.—
(a) The Legislature finds that under federal Medicaid
managed care regulations 42 CFR 438.3(e)(2) and 42 CFR 438.16,
the Agency for Health Care Administration may approve de-risking
disease behavioral health intervention services.
(b) The purpose of this section is to authorize the state
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1315 2026
Medicaid plan to fund a demonstration pilot program that shall
provide a de-risking disease behavioral health intervention
services management plan to recipients of the state Medicaid
plan in Region G, which consists of Indian River, Martin,
Okeechobee, Palm Beach, and St. Lucie Counties.
(2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "De-risking disease behavioral health intervention
services" means a set of five concurrent, chronic disease, self-
management services and medical nutrition supports demonstrated
in scientific research to improve behavioral health and chronic
disease outcomes. The term includes:
1. Behavioral health counseling by a licensed clinical
social worker for lifestyle modifications for patients diagnosed
with depression and uncontrolled diabetes mellitus.
2. Medical nutrition therapy by a registered dietitian
nutritionist for diet and lifestyle modifications for patients
with depression and uncontrolled diabetes mellitus.
3. Biomarker health tracking, nudging, and reporting by
Diabetes Supply Services Coverage Policy approved devices
including HbA1C, blood sugar glucose, oxygen, heart rate,
lipids, weight, body mass index, blood pressures, and other
biomarkers.
4. Medical disease nutrition education designed for
depression or diabetes mellitus, and is evidence-based, and
demonstrated to improve measurable health outcomes.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1315 2026
5. Medical nutrition supports are evidence-based lifestyle
modification services demonstrated to improve health outcomes
for patients diagnosed with depression and diabetes mellitus,
and include clinical nutrition groceries, or home-delivered
medically tailored meals, or produce prescriptions, or other
evidence-based medically necessary nutrition interventions
demonstrated to be cost effective by scientific research
studies.
(b) "Participant" means a Medicaid enrollee recipient and
recipient family participating in the pilot program.
(c) "Pilot program" means the demonstration pilot program
established by the state Medicaid plan.
(3) PILOT PROGRAM.—Contingent upon an appropriation, the
state Medicaid plan may fund a demonstration pilot program to
provide behavioral health intervention services for Region G,
which consists of Indian River, Martin, Okeechobee, Palm Beach,
and St. Lucie Counties.
(a) Under the pilot program, Medicaid managed assistance
providers may offer de-risking disease behavioral health
intervention services:
1. In lieu of services specified in the state Medicaid
plan to an enrollee who is diagnosed with both of the following:
a. Depression or anxiety.
b. Diabetes mellitus, obesity, or coronary heart disease.
2. To 1,000 participants as a disease management plan.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1315 2026
(b) The design, evaluation, and outcomes shall be from a
research evaluation conducted by nutrition scientists at Tufts
University Friedman School of Nutrition Science and Policy, a
qualified and accredited academic institution specialized in
nutrition, and the Florida Health and Nutrition Coalition
program implementation experts. The pilot program shall:
1. Design the de-risking disease behavioral health
intervention services, diabetic supply services, chronic disease
self-management and education services, and medical nutrition
supports coverage in lieu of services.
2. Review and assess health outcomes, biomarkers and data
on the impact to the pilot program participant, their family,
and their children to evaluate the pilot program disease
management plan impact.
3. Collect data including, but not limited to, the rate by
which pilot program participants, family, and children comply
with de-risking disease behavioral health intervention services;
health outcomes and biomarkers associated with the participant,
their family, and their children; impact on diagnosis, chronic
health condition and disease symptoms.
(4) ANNUAL REPORT.—The state Medicaid plan shall:
(a) As soon as practicable after the expiration of the
pilot program, prepare and submit to the Legislature a report on
the number of times during the preceding year the de-risking
100 disease behavioral health intervention services were used in
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1315 2026
101 Indian River, Martin, Okeechobee, Palm Beach, and St. Lucie
102 Counties, a summary of the data the state Medicaid plan
103 collected, and recommendations for any Legislative action.
104 (b) Consider the actual cost, measurable goals and health
105 outcomes met, and enrollee adherence of the de-risking disease
106 behavioral health intervention services when paying the
107 capitation rates for that organization under the contract.
108 (5) EXPIRATION.—
109 (a) The pilot program shall expire August 31, 2030.
110 (b) This section expires September 1, 2031.
111 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1315-00